Illinois, session 104th, HB5218.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 5-8-1.6 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1.6 new)7    Sec. 5-8-1.6. Mandatory supervised release placement for 8persons convicted of sex offenses.9    (a) In this Section:10    "Community of connection" means a community in which the 11individual has one or more verified ties, including, but not 12limited to, prior residence, family presence, verified 13employment or employment opportunities, enrollment in or 14acceptance to treatment or support services, or other 15substantial connections as determined by the Department of 16Corrections. 17    "Mandatory supervised release" has the meaning ascribed to 18it in Section 5-8-1.19    "Sentencing community" means the county or municipality in 20which the individual was convicted and sentenced. 21    "Sex offense" means an offense required to be registered 22under the Sex Offender Registration Act.23      HB5218- 2 -LRB104 19813 RLC 33263 b1    2    (b) An individual convicted of a sex offense and released 3from the Department of Corrections to mandatory supervised 4release shall, to the extent practicable, be placed on 5mandatory supervised release in either:6        (1) the sentencing community; or7        (2) a community of connection.8    (c) Placement outside the sentencing community or a 9community of connection may occur only upon a documented 10determination by the Department of Corrections that such 11placement is necessary due to one or more of the following:12        (1) verified public safety concerns;13        (2) victim safety considerations, including the 14    location of a victim or the existence of protective 15    orders;16        (3) the unavailability of compliant housing that 17    satisfies statutory or mandatory supervised release 18    conditions; or19        (4) the unavailability of required treatment, 20    monitoring, or supervision resources.21    (d) In determining placement under this Section, the 22Department of Corrections shall consider community impact, 23including:24        (1) the existing concentration of individuals on 25    mandatory supervised release for sex offenses in the 26    proposed community;  HB5218- 3 -LRB104 19813 RLC 33263 b1        (2) the capacity of local supervision and monitoring 2    resources; and3        (3) the availability of housing, employment, and 4    treatment services.5    The Department shall make reasonable efforts to avoid 6disproportionately burdening any single municipality, 7neighborhood, or county with mandatory supervised release 8placements for individuals convicted of sex offenses.9    (e) Prior to release, the Department of Corrections shall 10develop an individualized reentry plan for each individual 11subject to this Section that identifies the sentencing 12community and any communities of connection and evaluates 13appropriate housing, treatment, and supervision options.14    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 15the authority of the Department of Corrections to impose 16conditions of mandatory supervised release necessary to 17protect public safety or to comply with existing law.18    (g) The Department of Corrections shall submit an annual 19report to the General Assembly no later than March 1 of each 20year containing aggregate data regarding:21        (1) mandatory supervised release placement patterns 22    for individuals convicted of sex offenses;23        (2) the number of placements made outside sentencing 24    communities or communities of connection;25        (3) the primary reasons for such placements; and26        (4) geographic distribution by county.  HB5218- 4 -LRB104 19813 RLC 33263 b1    The report shall not include personally identifying 2information. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.